Washington statutes.
RCW 7.70.140

Medical malpractice closed claim reporting requirements.

(1) As used in this section:

(a) "Claim" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(1).

(b) "Claimant" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(2).

(c) "Commissioner" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(4).

(d) "Medical malpractice" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(9).

(2)(a) For claims settled or otherwise disposed of on or after January 1, 2008, the claimant or his or her attorney must report data to the commissioner if any action filed under this chapter results in a final:

(i) Judgment in any amount;

(ii) Settlement or payment in any amount; or

(iii) Disposition resulting in no indemnity payment.

(b) As used in this subsection, "data" means:

(i) The date of the incident of medical malpractice that was the principal cause of the action;

(ii) The principal county in which the incident of medical malpractice occurred;

(iii) The date of suit, if filed;

(iv) The injured person's sex and age on the incident date; and

(v) Specific information about the disposition, judgment, or settlement, including:

(A) The date and amount of any judgment or settlement;

(B) Court costs;

(C) Attorneys' fees; and

(D) Costs of expert witnesses.

[ 2006 c 8 s 209.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Part headings and subheadings not law—Severability—2006 c 8: See notes following RCW 5.64.010.